Hawaii statutes.
§132D-12 Sale to minors; sale by minors;
prohibited. It shall be unlawful for any person to offer for sale, sell,
or give any fireworks or articles pyrotechnic to minors, and for any minor to
possess, purchase, sell, or set off, ignite, or otherwise cause to explode any
fireworks or articles pyrotechnic, except as provided in section 132D-13. [L
1994, c 180, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 183, §14; am L 2008, c 38, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next